apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="f/å__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>år</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ik</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ået</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kom/me__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>met</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/indes__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indes</l>
	  <r>indes<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pas"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indes</l>
	  <r>indes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pas"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andtes</l>
	  <r>indes<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pas"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andtes</l>
	  <r>indes<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pas"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/igge__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igge</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igger</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igget</l>
          <r>igge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/age__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>age</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ager</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aget</l>
          <r>age<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="stem/me__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nå__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/ælle__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æl</l>
          <r>ælle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ælle</l>
          <r>ælle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æller</l>
          <r>ælle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alte</l>
          <r>ælle<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alt</l>
          <r>ælle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="løb/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="st/å__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>år</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ået</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ret/te__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tede</l>
          <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/ætte__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æt</l>
          <r>ætte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætte</l>
          <r>ætte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætter</l>
          <r>ætte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atte</l>
          <r>ætte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ætte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ske__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bestemme"><i>bestem</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bo"><i>bo</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opnå"><i>opnå</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="modtage"><i>modt</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="foretage"><i>foret</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fortage"><i>fort</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tælle"><i>t</i><par n="t/ælle__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fortælle"><i>fort</i><par n="t/ælle__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undgå"><i>undg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="løbe"><i>løb</i><par n="løb/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bestå"><i>best</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forstå"><i>forst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forestå"><i>forest</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="modstå"><i>modst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opstå"><i>opst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="henstå"><i>henst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sætte"><i>s</i><par n="s/ætte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fortsætte"><i>forts</i><par n="s/ætte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ansætte"><i>ans</i><par n="s/ætte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udsætte"><i>uds</i><par n="s/ætte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ske"><i>ske</i><par n="ske__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afglatte"><i>afglat</i><par n="ret/te__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afgå"><i>afg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afslutte"><i>afslut</i><par n="ret/te__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afstemme"><i>afstem</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bedømme"><i>bedøm</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beglo"><i>beglo</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="berette"><i>beret</i><par n="ret/te__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bero"><i>bero</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="besmitte"><i>besmit</i><par n="ret/te__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bestorme"><i>bestor</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="betro"><i>betro</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bidrage"><i>bidr</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drømme"><i>drøm</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="efterkomme"><i>efterkom</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flytte"><i>flyt</i><par n="ret/te__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forbarme"><i>forbar</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forbigå"><i>forbig</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fordømme"><i>fordøm</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="foredrage"><i>foredr</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fradømme"><i>fradøm</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fremgå"><i>fremg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fremkomme"><i>fremkom</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fremsætte"><i>frems</i><par n="s/ætte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fremstå"><i>fremst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gennemgå"><i>gennemg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="genoptage"><i>genopt</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="glo"><i>glo</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gø"><i>gø</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iagttage"><i>iagtt</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="idømme"><i>idøm</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imødegå"><i>imødeg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="indeslutte"><i>indeslut</i><par n="ret/te__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="indrømme"><i>indrøm</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="larme"><i>lar</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="misforstå"><i>misforst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="miste"><i>mis</i><par n="ret/te__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nedstemme"><i>nedstem</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omkomme"><i>omkom</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plette"><i>plet</i><par n="ret/te__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sne"><i>sne</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="svulme"><i>svul</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tømme"><i>tøm</i><par n="stem/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udkomme"><i>udkom</i><par n="kom/me__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vedtage"><i>vedt</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="findes"><i>f</i><par n="f/indes__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="få"><i>f</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gå"><i>g</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forgå"><i>forg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ligge"><i>l</i><par n="l/igge__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tage"><i>t</i><par n="t/age__vblex"/></e>
